New York, session 2025-2026, S1894.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Paige's law". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 2500-a of the public health law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph (l) to read as follows: 5 (l) Hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia and thoracic aortic aneu- 6 rysms and dissections through gene sequencing, Marfan syndrome and 7 related disorders. 8 § 3. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2500-n 9 to read as follows: 10 § 2500-n. Hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia, thoracic aortic aneu- 11 rysms, Marfan syndrome and related disorders prenatal screening aware- 12 ness. 1. As used in this section, "health care practitioner" means a 13 medical professional that provides prenatal care. 14 2. A health care practitioner caring for a pregnant person shall 15 provide to such person materials promulgated by the commissioner which 16 include information on being a potential carrier of hereditary hemor- 17 rhagic telangiectasia, thoracic aortic aneurysms, Marfan syndrome and 18 related disorders and the availability and options for prenatal screen- 19 ing for such conditions and disorders. 20 § 4. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3001-e to 21 read as follows: 22 § 3001-e. Brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm and stroke 23 awareness and response training. 1. (a) Teachers shall annually complete 24 a course or training in the identification of and response to a pupil EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03700-01-5 S. 1894 2 1 experiencing a brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm or 2 stroke. 3 (b) Documentation showing the successful completion of the instruction 4 required pursuant to this section shall be kept in such teacher's 5 personnel file. 6 2. The training required pursuant to this section may be performed by 7 the registered nurse at the school in which the teacher is hired to work 8 or by a recognized training program approved by the commissioner through 9 any method available, including but not limited to courses online or in 10 person. 11 § 5. Section 206 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 12 subdivision 32 to read as follows: 13 32. The commissioner, in consultation with the municipal police train- 14 ing council and the superintendent of state police, shall develop a 15 training program and associated training materials to be given annually, 16 to provide instruction and information to police officers and emergency 17 medical services personnel on protocols for the identification of and 18 response to an individual experiencing a brain arteriovenous malforma- 19 tion, brain aneurysm or stroke. 20 § 6. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 3055 to 21 read as follows: 22 § 3055. Brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm and stroke 23 response training. The commissioner shall provide the training program 24 relating to protocols for the identification of and response to an indi- 25 vidual experiencing a brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm 26 or stroke pursuant to subdivision thirty-two of section two hundred six 27 of this chapter to all emergency medical services personnel including, 28 but not limited to, first responders, emergency medical technicians, 29 advanced emergency medical technicians and emergency vehicle operators. 30 § 7. Section 840 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 31 subdivision 8 to read as follows: 32 8. The council shall, in addition: 33 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the 34 commissioner of health, written policies and procedures consistent with 35 subdivision thirty-two of section two hundred six of the public health 36 law, regarding protocols for the identification of and response to an 37 individual experiencing a brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneu- 38 rysm or stroke. Such policies and procedures shall make provisions for 39 the education and training of new and veteran police officers on such 40 protocols; and 41 (b) Recommend to the governor, rules and regulations with respect to 42 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing annual basis of a 43 training program for all current and new police officers regarding the 44 policies and procedures established pursuant to this subdivision. 45 § 8. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 214-j to 46 read as follows: 47 § 214-j. Brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm and stroke 48 response training. The superintendent shall, for all members of the 49 state police: 50 1. Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the commis- 51 sioner of health, written policies and procedures consistent with subdi- 52 vision thirty-two of section two hundred six of the public health law, 53 regarding protocols for the identification of and response to an indi- 54 vidual experiencing a brain arteriovenous malformation, brain aneurysm 55 or stroke. Such policies and procedures shall make provisions for the 56 education and training of new and veteran police officers on the proto- S. 1894 3 1 cols for response to victims of suspected drug overdose and the adminis- 2 tration of opioid antagonists; and 3 2. Recommend to the governor, rules and regulations with respect to 4 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing annual basis of a 5 training program for all current and new police officers regarding the 6 policies and procedures established pursuant to this subdivision. 7 § 9. The education law is amended by adding a new section 926 to read 8 as follows: 9 § 926. Brain arteriovenous malformation and brain aneurysm awareness. 10 Each school shall provide to the parent or guardian of every child 11 entering kindergarten educational materials promulgated by the commis- 12 sioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, regarding brain 13 arteriovenous malformation and brain aneurysms, as well as information 14 on being a potential carrier of hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia, 15 thoracic aortic aneurysms, Marfan syndrome and related disorders and the 16 availability and options for genetic testing for such conditions and 17 disorders. 18 § 10. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day 19 after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, 20 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 21 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 22 made and completed on or before such effective date.